Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 17
AUDITS OF COUNTY RECORDS

Sec.

§ 31-1701. Audit of county finances — Filing.

The board of county commissioners of every county shall cause to be made, annually, a full and complete audit of the financial transactions of the county. Such audit shall be made by and under the direction of the board of county commissioners as required in section 67-450B, Idaho Code.

§ 31-1702 — 31-1707. Form of contract — Biennial audit — Expenses — Report — Neglect of duty. [Repealed.]